Massachusetts, session 194th, H2111.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1 of chapter 151A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 343-344, the words “reported for the highest quarter” 
and inserting in place thereof the following words:-  
wages reported for the highest quarter, and provided further, that if such deeming renders 
the individual ineligible for unemployment benefits, the amount shall be one twenty-sixth of the 
total wages reported in the two quarters.